North Carolina statutes. Chapter 147. State Officers.
Article 3D. State Information Technology Services. [Repealed]

Part 1. State Information Technology Management.

§§ 147-33.72A through 147-33.72F.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

History.

G.S. 147-33.72

A; 2004-129, s. 2; 2011-266, s. 1.9(b); repealed by 2015-241, s 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

G.S. 147-33.72

B; 2004-129, s. 2; 2013-329, s. 1; repealed by 2015-241, s 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.72C; 2004-129, s. 2; 2013-188, s. 2; 2013-329, s. 2; 2013-360, s. 7.7(d); repealed by 2015-241, s 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.72D; 2004-129, s. 2; 2007-282, s. 1; repealed by 2015-241, s 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.72E; 2004-129, s. 2; 2007-281, s. 1; repealed by 2015-241, s 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.72F; 2004-129, s. 2; 2006-264, s. 71; repealed by 2015-241, s 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

Cross References.

For current provisions as to the Department of Information Technology, see Article 15 of Chapter 143B (G.S. 143B-1320 et seq.).

§ 147-33.72G.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-266, s. 1.9(a), effective July 1, 2011.

History.

S. 147-33.72G; 2004-129, s. 2; 2007-189, s. 4; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.9(a), effective July 1, 2011.

§ 147-33.72H.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015

History.

2004-129, s. 2; 2011-266, s. 1.9(c); 2013-329, s. 3; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a).

§§ 147-33.73,
147-33.74.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 1A. Organization of Office of Information Technology Services.

§§ 147-33.75 through 147-33.77.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

History.

G.S. 147-33.75

; 1999-434, s. 9; 2000-174, s. 2; 2004-129, ss. 1, 9; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.76; 1999-434, s. 10; 2000-174, s. 2; 2004-129, ss. 1, 3; 2012-142, s. 25.1(e); 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33-77; 1989, c. 239, s. 5; c. 770, s. 60; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 36; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 14(g); c. 1030, s. 51.14; 1997-148, ss. 5, 6; 1999-347, s. 2; 1999-434, s. 27; 2000-174, s. 2; 2004-129, s. 1; 2007-155, s. 1; 2007-189, ss. 1, 5.1; 2013-329, s. 4; 2013-382, ss. 4.2, 9.1(c); 2013-410, s. 47.2(b); repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

Cross References.

For current provisions as to the Department of Information Technology, see Article 15 of Chapter 143B (§ 143B-1320 et seq.).

§§ 147-33.78,
147-33.79.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2004-129, ss. 4, 5.

Part 2. General Powers and Duties.

§§ 147-33.80 through 147-33.84.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

History.

G.S. 147-33.80

; 1999-434, s. 10; 2000-174, s. 2; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.81; 1999-434, s. 9; 2000-174, s. 2; 2001-424, s. 15.2(a); 2013-333, s. 1(a), (b); 2013-410, s. 24; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33-82; 1999-434, s. 10; 2000-174, s. 2; 2001-424, s. 15.2(b); 2002-126, s. 27.2(a); 2003-153, ss. 1(a), 1(b); 2004-129, ss. 10, 11, 12, 13.; 2011-266, s. 1.9(d); 2012-142, s. 6A.2; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015; G.S. 147-33-83; 1989, c. 239, s. 5; c. 770, s. 60; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 36; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 14(g); c. 1030, s. 51.14; 1997-148, ss. 5, 6; 1999-347, s. 2; 1999-434, s. 27; 2000-174, s. 2; 2004-129, s. 15; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33-84; 1989, c. 239, s. 5; c. 770, s. 60; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 36; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 14(g); c. 1030, s. 51.14; 1997-148, ss. 5, 6; 1999-347, s. 2; 1999-434, s. 27; 2000-174, s. 2; 2004-129, s. 16; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

Cross References.

For current provisions as to the Department of Information Technology, see Article 15 of Chapter 143B (G.S. 143B-1320 et seq.).

§§ 147-33.85,
147-33.86.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2004-129, ss. 17, 18, effective July 1, 2004.

§§ 147-33.87 through 147-33.90.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

History.

G.S. 147-33.87

; 1999-434, s. 10; 2000-140, s. 93.1(i); 2000-174, s. 2; 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2004-129, s. 19; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

G.S. 147-33.87

A; 2012-142, s. 6A.12(a), (c); repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.88; 1999-434, s. 10; 2000-174, s. 2; 2004-129, s. 20; 2013-360, s. 7.2 (a); repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.89; 2003-153, s. 2; 2004-129, s. 21; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.90; 2003-172, s. 1; 2004-129, s. 22; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

§§ 147-33.91 through 147-33.93.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

History.

G.S. 147-33.91

; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1024, s. 1; 1987, c. 738, s. 59(a)(2); 1989, c. 239, s. 4; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 37; 1991, c. 542, s. 14; 1993, c. 512, s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 777, s. 1(a); 1997-148, ss. 3, 6; 1999-347, s. 4; 1999-434, s. 29; 2000-174, s. 2; 2004-129, s. 23; 2013-188, s. 3; 2014-100, s. 7.12(a); repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.92; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1024, s. 1; 1987, c. 738, s. 59(a)(2); 1989, c. 239, s. 4; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 37; 1991, c. 542, s. 14; 1993, c. 512, s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 777, s. 1(a); 1997-148, ss. 3, 6; 1999-347, s. 4; 1999-434, s. 29; 2000-174, s. 2; 2004-203, s. 37(b); 2013-188, s. 4; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33-93; 2001-142, s. 1; 2009-136, s. 1; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

§ 147-33.94.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 4. Procurement of Information Technology.

§§ 147-33.95 through 147-33.103.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

History.

G.S. 147-33.95

; 1999-434, s. 10; 2000-174, s. 2; 2002-107, s. 4; 2002-159, s. 64(a); 2004-129, s. 24; 2009-451, s. 6.14A(a); 2013-333, s. 2; 2013-418, s. 2(e); repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.96; 1999-434, s. 10; 2000-174, s. 210-241; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.97; 1999-434, s. 10; 2000-174, s. 2; 2006-264, s. 72(a); repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.98; 1999-434, s. 10; 2000-174, s. 2; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.99; 1999-434, s. 10; 2000-174, s. 2; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.100; 1999-434, s. 10; 2000-174, s. 2; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.101; 1999-434, s. 10; 2000-174, s. 2; 2004-129, s. 25; 2007-484, s. 20; 2013-234, s. 5; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.102; 1999-434, s. 10; 2000-174, s. 2; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.103; 1999-434, s. 10; 2000-174, s. 2; 2004-129, s. 26; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

§ 147-33.104.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2010-67, s. 1(a)-(d), effective July 1, 2010.

History.

2007-550, s. 16.5; 2008-198, s. 11.4; 2008-208, ss. 5, 7; 2009-484, s. 16(b); 2009-550, s. 10(a), (b); repealed by 2010-67, s. 1(a)-(d), effective July 1, 2010.

§ 147-33.104A.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

History.

2010-67, s. 5(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u); repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

§§ 147-33.105 through 147-33.109.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 5. Security for Information Technology Services.

§§ 147-33.110 through 147-33.113.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

History.

G.S. 147-33.110

; 2001-424, s. 15.2(b); 2004-129, ss. 12, 14; 2011-266, s. 1.9(e); repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.111; 2001-424, s. 15.2(b); 2004-129, ss. 10, 12, 14; 2010-31, s. 6.15(a); 2013-188, s. 5; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.112; 2003-153, s. 1(a); 2004-129, ss. 12, 14; 2013-188, s. 6; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.113; 2001-424, s. 15.2(b); 2003-153, s. 1(a); 2004-129, ss. 12, 14; 2007-155, s. 2; 2007-189, ss. 2, 5.1; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

§§ 147-33.114 through 147-33.119.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 6. Purchase of Refurbished Computer Equipment.

§§ 147-33.120 through 147-33.123.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.

History.

G.S. 147-33.120

; 2013-128, s. 1; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.121; 2013-128, s. 2; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.122; 2013-128, s. 3; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015. G.S. 147-33.123; 2013-128, s. 4; repealed by 2015-241, s. 7A.2(a), effective September 18, 2015.